South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3423.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Emergency Fuel Supply Act." SECTION 2.  Chapter 6, Title 48 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 48-6-90. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Fuel station" means any establishment primarily engaged in selling gasoline or diesel fuel for use in motor vehicles. (2) "Evacuation routes" means major roads or highways designated by the State or federal government as primary routes for evacuating the public during emergencies. (3) "Backup generator" means a power generation unit capable of supplying sufficient power to operate fuel pumps and essential services at the fuel station during power outages. (B)(1) Any fuel station under construction after January 1, 2025, located within a half mile of a designated evacuation route or located on a South Carolina primary highway is required to install wiring capable of connecting a backup generator to power the station's fuel pumps, cash registers, and essential lighting. (2) Any fuel station operational as of January 1, 2025, located within a half mile of designated evacuation routes or a South Carolina primary highway is not required to retrofit with pre-wiring for a generator unless undertaking significant renovations. For purposes of this item, "significant renovations" means renovations exceeding fifty percent of the station's assessed value. (3) By January 1, 2026, any operational fuel station that is part of a chain operating ten or more locations within South Carolina must install wiring capable of connecting a backup generator to power that station's fuel pumps, cash registers, and essential lighting and must, at a minimum, have access to a working generator that can be deployed within twenty-four hours following a declared emergency. (C) Fuel stations subject to this section must certify compliance to the Department of Environmental Services, which shall oversee enforcement in coordination with local emergency management officials. Noncompliant fuel stations may be subject to fines and penalties as determined by the department. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----